Maine, session 132, LD601.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 35-A MRSA c. 43, sub-c. 1, as amended, is repealed.
Sec. 2. 38 MRSA §1474, sub-§2, as amended by PL 1993, c. 541, §1, is further
amended to read:
2. Ratification. Except for an agreement with the Southeast Compact Commission
for acceptance through June 30, 1994 of low-level radioactive waste generated by and on
the premises of any facility of the United States Navy in Kittery, Maine, any compact or
agreement with any other state or states or the Federal Government for low-level waste
disposal must be ratified by legislative act and, in accordance with subchapter IV, by the
voters of the State.
Sec. 3. 38 MRSA §1479, 2nd ¶, as amended by PL 1995, c. 642, §17, is further
amended to read:
Approval under this section does not replace any other license required by law and is
in addition to the voter approval required by section 1493.
Sec. 4. 38 MRSA §1482, sub-§4, as amended by PL 1995, c. 642, §20, is further
amended to read:
4. Licensing. A low-level radioactive waste disposal facility developed in the State
must be licensed by the United States Nuclear Regulatory Commission. The facility must
be approved by the Legislature in accordance with section 1479 and approved by the voters
in accordance with section 1493.
Sec. 5. 38 MRSA c. 14-A, sub-c. 4, as amended, is repealed.